Washington statutes.
RCW 16.65.424

Additional sales days limited to sales of horses and/or mules.

The director has the authority to grant a licensee an additional sales day, or days, limited to the sale of horses and/or mules and may if requested grant the licensee, by permit, the authority to have the sale at premises other than at his or her public livestock market if the facilities are approved by the director as being adequate for the protection of the health and safety of the horses and/or mules. For the purpose of such limited sale the facility requirements of RCW 16.65.360 shall not be applicable.

[ 2003 c 326 s 88; 1963 c 232 s 19.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2003 c 326: See RCW 16.57.902.